Utah statutes.
53-3-410.1.   Medical certification requirements.

(1)  A person whose medical certification status is:

(a)  "non-excepted interstate" under Subsection 53-3-402(13)(a) is required to provide the division a medical self certification and an updated medical examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 upon request by the division;

(b)  "excepted interstate" under Subsection 53-3-402(13)(b) is required to provide to the division a medical self certification upon request by the division;

(c)  "non-excepted intrastate" under Subsection 53-3-402(13)(c) is required to, upon request by the division:

(i)  provide to the division a medical self certification; and

(ii)  comply with the requirements of Section 53-3-303.5; or

(d)  "excepted intrastate" under Subsection 53-3-402(13)(b) is required to, upon request by the division:

(i)  provide to the division a medical self certification; and

(ii) (A)  provide to the division an updated medical examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45; or

(B)  comply with the requirements of Section 53-3-303.5.

(2)  A request by the division for a person to comply with Subsection (1) shall correspond with the expiration of the previously submitted medical examiner's certificate.

(3)  If a person fails to comply with a request under this section, the person shall be required to downgrade the person's CDL to a class D license.

(4)  Failure to comply with the requirement of this section shall result in the denial of the license under Section 53-3-221.



Amended by Chapter 411, 2013 General Session

